Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB1951.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Short title.This act shall be known and may be cited as the State Correctional Institution Land Sale Transparency Act.Section 2. Definitions.The following words and phrases when used in this act shall have the meanings given to them in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Approval certificate." A certificate issued by the Office of Attorney General that indicates the acceptance of a bid to purchase real estate and certifies the Office of Attorney General has adhered to the requirements of this act."Department." The Department of Corrections of the Commonwealth.12345678910111213141516171819 "State correctional institution." A State correctional institution as defined in 61 Pa.C.S. § 102 (relating to definitions) that is permanently closing at the direction of the department according to the act of October 24, 2018 (P.L.813, No.133), known as the Public Safety Facilities Act.Section 3. Sale of real estate of State correctional institution.In addition to any other requirement under law, if real estate that was formerly a State correctional institution is offered for sale:(1) The department shall transmit a notice of intention to sell real estate of the State correctional institution to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin. The notice shall include a description of the real estate and information on how to submit bids to the Attorney General for purchase of the real estate.(2) Bids for the purchase of the real estate under this act shall be accepted by the Attorney General for 30 days.(3) The Attorney General shall review bids within seven days after closure of the bidding process. The Attorney General shall approve the sale of the real estate to the highest responsible bidder with acceptable conditions.(4) The department, in consultation with the Attorney General, may establish a reserve amount of money that must be met prior to acceptance of an offer under paragraph (3).(5) The Attorney General shall submit the names of all bidders and bid amounts to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin after the bidding process is complete.20250HB1951PN2459 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (6) The Attorney General shall transmit the name and bid amount accepted by the Attorney General to the Legislative Reference Bureau for publication in the next available issue of the Pennsylvania Bulletin.(7) The deed conveying the real estate to the highest responsible bidder shall be filed with the office of the recorder of deeds located in the county where the real estate is situate and must be accompanied by an approval certificate.Section 4. Application.This act shall apply to the sale of real estate on which a State correctional institution is located if the sale occurs on or after the effective date of this section.Section 5. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250HB1951PN2459 - 3 - 123456789101112131415